Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 14.2 The Micro Businesses Act

37-14.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Micro Businesses Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 500, § 2.

37-14.2-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to carry out the state’s policy of supporting the fullest possible participation of micro businesses in the economic activity in the state of Rhode Island, including, but not limited to, state-directed public construction programs and projects and in-state purchases of goods and services. The purpose of this chapter includes assisting micro businesses throughout the life of any contracts with the state of Rhode Island or its agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 500, § 2.

37-14.2-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Contract” means a mutually binding legal relationship, or any modification thereof, obligating the seller to furnish supplies or services, including construction, and the buyer to pay for them. As used in this chapter, a lease is a contract.

“Contractor” means one who participates, through a contract or subcontract, in any procurement or program covered by this chapter and includes lessees and material suppliers.

“Micro business” means a Rhode Island-based business entity, regardless of whether it is in the form of a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, general partnership, or sole proprietorship, that has a total of ten (10) or fewer members, owners, and employees and has gross sales totaling five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less.

“MB coordinator” means the official designated to have overall responsibility for promoting, coordinating, documenting, and implementing efforts related to micro businesses.

“Registered” means those micro businesses that have provided their business name, address, owner-contact information, number of employees, and annual gross sales to the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 500, § 2.

37-14.2-4.
Compilation and reporting of data on micro businesses.

The department of administration shall compile and maintain data on the existence of registered micro businesses to facilitate the achievement of the purpose of this chapter. Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this statute [July 20, 2016], the department of administration shall submit a report to the governor and general assembly that describes the methodology being used to compile such data and to report annual utilization of registered, micro businesses in state-directed public construction programs and projects and in-state purchases of goods and services. The report shall be made public contemporaneously with its submission to the governor and general assembly.

The department of administration shall maintain a micro business registration database that shall include the business name, address, owner-contact information, number of employees, and annual gross sales. Such registration of micro businesses with the department of administration shall be on a voluntary basis, and does not supersede any mandated, business-registration requirements with the secretary of state or other general offices, as well as with any city or town as applicable.

On or before January 1, 2017, and on or before the first day of January in all years thereafter, the department of administration shall submit a report to the governor and general assembly consisting of data concerning the registration of micro businesses in the state. The data shall include, but not be limited to: the number of registered micro businesses; the distribution of registered, micro businesses among the thirty-nine (39) cities or towns in the state; the number of registered, micro businesses that are also Rhode Island-certified minority business enterprises; and the number of registered, micro businesses that are also Rhode Island-certified women business enterprises.

At the request of the director of the department of administration, the secretary of state, or all other general officers of the state, all agencies of the state and all cities and towns shall make reasonable modifications to their record keeping procedures to facilitate the compilation of data concerning the existence of micro businesses in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 500, § 2.